Hawaii statutes.
§612-8 Pay of jurors; mileage fee; bus
fare; parking violations exemption. (a) Each juror or prospective
juror shall be paid $30 for each day of actual attendance at court. In
addition, each juror or prospective juror shall be paid the higher of either:

(1) 33 cents for each mile actually and necessarily
traveled in going to and from court; or

(2) The cost of an adult bus fare to and from the
court.

A person who appears at the time for which that
person is summoned to court for jury duty may be allowed the mileage fee or bus
fare although the person, upon that person's request, is subsequently excused
or exempted from jury service.

(b) In the discretion of the court, any juror
who incurs expenses for transportation, board, and lodging as a result of the
distance the juror resides from the location of the court, may be reimbursed
for actual expenses.

(c) All jurors or prospective jurors shall be
exempt from any prosecution, penalty, or fine as a result of a parking
violation committed in connection with the juror or prospective juror appearing
at court for jury duty; provided that the juror or prospective juror shall
present any parking citation received during this time to the court clerk of
the circuit court or district court or the jury pool clerk, as appropriate, who
shall verify that the juror or prospective juror was serving on jury duty or
appearing in court in response to a summons for jury duty at the time the
citation was received. The clerk of the circuit court or district court or the
jury pool clerk, as appropriate, shall keep an attendance roll in which shall
be entered each juror's or prospective juror's name, each date the juror or
prospective juror was summoned and appeared for jury duty, and the date the
juror or prospective juror was discharged from service. The supreme court
shall adopt rules necessary to effect this section. [L 1973, c 191, pt of §1;
am L 1974, c 147, §1; am L 1985, c 261, §1; am L 1986, c 251, §1; am L 1988, c
189, §1 and c 281, §1; am L 1993, c 104, §2; am L 2007, c 122, §5; am L 2015, c
17, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next